Utah statutes.
58-1-203.   Duties, functions, and responsibilities of division in collaboration with board -- Construction Services Commission.

(1)  The following duties, functions, and responsibilities of the division shall be performed by the division with the collaboration and assistance of the appropriate board:

(a)  defining which schools, colleges, universities, departments of universities, military educational and training programs, or other institutions of learning are reputable and in good standing with the division;

(b)  prescribing license qualifications;

(c)  prescribing rules governing applications for licenses;

(d)  providing for a fair and impartial method of examination of applicants;

(e)  defining unprofessional conduct, by rule, to supplement the definitions under this chapter or other licensing chapters;

(f)  establishing advisory peer committees to the board and prescribing their scope of authority; and

(g)  establishing conditions for reinstatement and renewal of licenses.

(2)  Notwithstanding Subsection (1), the duties, functions, and responsibilities of the division outlined in Subsection (1) shall, instead, be performed by the Construction Services Commission for all purposes of Title 58, Chapter 55, Utah Construction Trades Licensing.

